California, session 20252026, SB911.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1102.19 of the Civil Code is amended to read:1102.19. (a) On and after July 1, 2021, a seller of a real property subject to this article that is located in a high or very high fire hazard severity zone, as identified by the Director of Forestry and Fire Protection pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code or Article 9 (commencing with Section 4201) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Public Resources Code, shall provide to the buyer documentation stating that the property is in compliance with Section 4291 of the Public Resources Code or local vegetation management ordinances, as follows:(1) In a local jurisdiction that has enacted an ordinance requiring an owner of real property to obtain documentation that the property is in compliance with Section 4291 of the Public Resources Code or a local vegetation management ordinance, the seller shall provide the buyer with a copy of the documentation that complies with the requirements of that local ordinance and information on the local agency from which a copy of that documentation may be obtained.(2) In a local jurisdiction that has not enacted an ordinance for an owner of real property to obtain documentation that a property is in compliance with Section 4291 of the Public Resources Code or a local vegetation management ordinance, and if a state or local agency, or other government entity, or other qualified nonprofit entity, provides an inspection with documentation for the jurisdiction in which the property is located, the seller shall provide the buyer with the documentation obtained in the six-month period preceding the date the seller enters into a transaction to sell that real property and provide information on the local agency from which a copy of that documentation may be obtained.(b) On and after July 1, 2021, if the seller of a real property described in subdivision (a) has not obtained documentation of compliance in accordance with paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a), the seller and the buyer shall enter into a written agreement pursuant to which the buyer agrees to obtain documentation of compliance with Section 4291 of the Public Resources Code or a local vegetation management ordinance as follows:(1) In a local jurisdiction that has enacted an ordinance requiring an owner or buyer to obtain documentation of compliance with Section 4291 of the Public Resources Code or a local vegetation management ordinance, the buyer shall comply with that ordinance.(2) (A) In a local jurisdiction that has not enacted an ordinance requiring an owner or buyer to obtain documentation of compliance, and if a state or local agency, or other government entity, or other qualified nonprofit entity, provides an inspection with documentation for the jurisdiction in which the property is located, the buyer shall obtain documentation of compliance within one year of the date of the close of escrow.(B)Before the close of escrow, the seller shall notify the local fire department having jurisdiction over the property, or the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection if the property is within a state responsibility area, as described in Section 4125 of the Public Resources Code, of the written agreement and the buyer’s obligation to obtain documentation of compliance pursuant to subparagraph (A). The written agreement and documentation of compliance may be transmitted electronically or by hard copy.(B) (i) When a written agreement is executed pursuant to this subdivision, the buyer shall disclose whether they have an obligation to obtain documentation of compliance within one year of the date of the close of escrow pursuant to that agreement on the preliminary change of ownership report filed pursuant to Section 480.3 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, in accordance with Section 480.4 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.(ii) The county assessor shall make available to the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection and to local fire agencies the property address of any property, and name of the transferee, for which the transferee indicated on the preliminary change of ownership report that the property is located in a high or very high fire hazard severity zone and that the transferee has an obligation to obtain documentation of compliance within one year of the date of the close of escrow pursuant to a written agreement executed pursuant to this subdivision.(C) (i) If the local fire department or the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, as applicable, has not received documentation of compliance from a qualified entity or otherwise certified compliance within one year of the date of the close of escrow, the fire department or the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, as applicable, shall conduct a compliance inspection at the property.(ii) The local fire department or the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, as applicable, may delegate the responsibility to conduct a compliance check inspection to a third-party, nonprofit entity that it or the State Fire Marshal deems qualified to conduct defensible space programs and compliance inspections and reinspections.(iii) Compliance inspections and reinspections may be conducted via in-person, on-site inspection, or by remote verification by the property owner using photographic evidence or by documentation of completed work.(iv) The local fire department may prioritize compliance inspections and reinspections based on factors including, but not limited to, wildfire risk and repetitive noncompliance.(D) (i) A local fire department may recover the costs of compliance inspections and reinspections pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 13146.2 of, and Section 13916 of, the Health and Safety Code.(ii) Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to modify the immunities granted to a local fire department under any provision of law, including, but not limited to, Sections 815, 818.2, and 818.8 of the Government Code.(iii) This subparagraph does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, existing law.(c) Nothing in this section, including the existence of an agreement between a buyer and seller pursuant to subdivision (b), shall limit the ability of a state or local agency to enforce defensible space requirements pursuant to Section 51182 of the Government Code, Section 4291 of the Public Resources Code, or other applicable statutes, regulations, and local ordinances.SEC. 2. Section 408 of the Revenue and Taxation Code is amended to read:408. (a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (b), (c), (d), (e), and (g), any information and records in the assessor’s office that are not required by law to be kept or prepared by the assessor, disabled veterans’ exemption claims, and homeowners’ exemption claims are not public documents and shall not be open to public inspection. Property receiving the homeowners’ exemption shall be clearly identified on the assessment roll. The assessor shall maintain records that shall be open to public inspection to identify those claimants who have been granted the homeowners’ exemption.(b) (1) The assessor may provide any appraisal data in the assessor’s possession to the assessor of any county.(2) The assessor shall disclose information, furnish abstracts, or permit access to all records in the assessor’s office to law enforcement agencies, the county grand jury, the board of supervisors or their duly authorized agents, employees, or representatives when conducting an investigation of the assessor’s office pursuant to Section 25303 of the Government Code, the county recorder when conducting an investigation to determine whether a documentary transfer tax is imposed, the Controller, employees of the Controller for property tax postponement purposes, probate referees, employees of the Franchise Tax Board for tax administration purposes only, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, staff appraisers of the Division of Financial Institutions, the Department of Transportation, the Department of General Services, the High-Speed Rail Authority, the State Board of Equalization, the State Lands Commission, the State Department of Social Services, the Department of Child Support Services, the Department of Water Resources, the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, local fire departments and fire protection districts, and other duly authorized legislative or administrative bodies of the state pursuant to their authorization to examine the records. Whenever the assessor discloses information, furnishes abstracts, or permits access to records in the assessor’s office to staff appraisers of the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, the Department of Transportation, the Department of General Services, the High-Speed Rail Authority, the State Lands Commission, or the Department of Water Resources pursuant to this section, the department, commission, or authority shall reimburse the assessor for any costs incurred as a result.(c) Upon the request of the tax collector, the assessor shall disclose and provide to the tax collector information used in the preparation of that portion of the unsecured roll for which the taxes thereon are delinquent. The tax collector shall certify to the assessor that the tax collector needs the information requested for the enforcement of the tax lien in collecting those delinquent taxes. Information requested by the tax collector may include social security numbers, and the assessor shall recover from the tax collector the assessor’s actual and reasonable costs for providing the information. The tax collector shall add the costs described in the preceding sentence to the assessee’s delinquent tax lien and collect those costs subject to subdivision (e) of Section 2922.(d) The assessor shall, upon the request of an assessee or the assessee’s designated representative, permit the assessee or representative to inspect or copy any market data in the assessor’s possession. For purposes of this subdivision, “market data” means any information in the assessor’s possession, whether or not required to be prepared or kept by the assessor, relating to the sale of any property comparable to the property of the assessee, if the assessor bases an assessment of the assessee’s property, in whole or in part, on that comparable sale or sales. The assessor shall provide the names of the seller and buyer of each property on which the comparison is based, the location of that property, the date of the sale, and the consideration paid for the property, whether paid in money or otherwise. However, for purposes of providing market data, the assessor shall not display any document relating to the business affairs or property of another.(e) (1) With respect to information, documents, and records, other than market data as defined in subdivision (d), the assessor shall, upon request of an assessee of property or the assessee’s designated representative, permit the assessee or representative to inspect or copy all information, documents, and records, including auditors’ narrations and workpapers, whether or not required to be kept or prepared by the assessor, relating to the appraisal and the assessment of the assessee’s property, and any penalties and interest.(A) Upon written request of an assessee or the assessee’s designated representative, the assessor shall transmit the information, documents, or records described in paragraph (1) by mail, or in electronic format if the information, documents, or records are available in electronic format or have been previously digitized. This subparagraph shall not be construed or interpreted to limit the authority of the assessee or the assessee’s designated representative to also inspect or copy information, documents, or records described in paragraph (1).(B) Information, documents, and records requested by an assessee, or the assessee’s representative, shall be transmitted pursuant to subparagraph (A) within a reasonable time period.(C) The costs enumerated in subdivision (a) of Section 409 shall not apply to information, documents, or records requested by the assessee or the assessee’s designated representative if that information is transmitted in electronic format, except that any developmental or indirect costs to provide that information, including costs to acquire or compile data that is not required to be kept or prepared by the assessor, may be recovered pursuant to Section 409.(2) After enrolling an assessment, the assessor shall respond to a written request for information supporting the assessment, including, but not limited to, any appraisal and other data requested by the assessee.(3) Except as provided in Section 408.1, an assessee or the assessee’s designated representative shall not be permitted to inspect or copy information and records that also relate to the property or business affairs of another, unless that disclosure is ordered by a competent court in a proceeding initiated by a taxpayer seeking to challenge the legality of the assessment of the taxpayer’s property.(f) (1) Permission for the inspection or copying requested pursuant to subdivision (d) or (e) shall be granted as soon as reasonably possible to the assessee or the assessee’s designated representative.(2) If the assessee or the assessee’s designated representative requests the assessor to make copies of any of the requested records, the assessee shall reimburse the assessor for the reasonable costs incurred in reproducing and providing the copies.(3) If the assessor fails to permit the inspection or copying of materials or information as requested pursuant to subdivision (d) or (e) and the assessor introduces any requested materials or information at any assessment appeals board hearing, the assessee or the assessee’s representative may request and shall be granted a continuance for a reasonable period of time. The continuance shall extend the two-year period specified in subdivision (c) of Section 1604 for a period of time equal to the period of continuance.(g) Upon the written request of the tax collector, the assessor shall provide to the tax collector information for the preparation and enforcement of Part 6 (commencing with Section 3351). The tax collector shall certify to the assessor that the tax collector needs the contact information to assist with the preparation and enforcement of Part 6 (commencing with Section 3351). The assessor shall provide the information, which shall not include social security numbers. Any information provided to the tax collector pursuant to this subdivision shall not become a public record and shall not be open to public inspection. The tax collector shall reimburse the assessor for the actual and reasonable costs incurred by the assessor for providing the information to administer this subdivision. The tax collector shall add the costs described in the preceding sentence to the assessee’s delinquent taxes and include the costs incurred subject to Sections 4112 and 4672.2. The tax collector or the tax collector’s designated employee shall, under penalty of perjury, certify to the assessor that they need the information to assist with the preparation and enforcement of Part 6 (commencing with Section 3351), and that the information provided pursuant to this subdivision that is not a public record and that is not open to public inspection shall not become a public record and shall not be open to public inspection.SEC. 3. Section 480.4 of the Revenue and Taxation Code is amended to read:480.4. (a) The preliminary change of ownership report referred to in Section 480.3 shall give information relative to the transfer. The information shall include, but not be limited to, a description of the property, the parties to the transaction, the date of acquisition, the amount, if any, of the consideration paid for the property, whether paid in money or otherwise, and the terms of the transaction. The preliminary change in ownership report shall not include any question that is not germane to the assessment function.(b) Notwithstanding the requirements of subdivision (a), the preliminary change of ownership report referred to in Revenue and Taxation Code Section 480.3 shall include a question specifying whether the property is located in a high or very high fire hazard severity zone, as identified by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code or Article 9 (commencing with Section 4201) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Public Resources Code, and, if so, whether the buyer has an obligation to obtain documentation of compliance within one year of the date of the close of escrow pursuant to a written agreement executed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1102.19 of the Civil Code.(b)(c) The State Board of Equalization, after consultation with the California Assessors’ Association and interested parties, shall prescribe the preliminary change of ownership report for the purpose of maintaining statewide uniformity in the contents of the report.SEC. 2.SEC. 4. The Legislature finds and declares that the prevention of wildland fires is a matter of statewide concern and is not a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Section 1 of this act amending Section 1102.19 of the Civil Code applies to all cities, including charter cities.SEC. 3.SEC. 5. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.